Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-828.05
Squad leader; squad member; compensation; expenses.

(1) The office of the State Fire Marshal is responsible for paying the compensation of any squad leader or squad member who is an employee of the State Fire Marshal while such squad leader or squad member is assigned to a wildland fire incident, including any overtime worked by such squad leader or squad member.

(2) The Nebraska Forest Service is responsible for paying the compensation of any squad leader or squad member who is an employee of the Nebraska Forest Service while such squad leader or squad member is assigned to a wildland fire incident, including any overtime worked by such squad leader or squad member.

(3) Each squad leader and squad member shall be reimbursed as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177 for expenses incurred as a result of being assigned to a wildland fire incident.

(4) The State Fire Marshal and the Nebraska Forest Service shall be responsible for requesting adequate appropriations each fiscal year to pay the expenses of any employee who is selected to be a squad leader or squad member of the Wildland Incident Response Assistance Team, including expenses predicted to be incurred pursuant to this section and section 81-828.06.

Laws 2024, LB1300, § 24.